Hawaii statutes.
§621-7 Fees; criminal cases. (a)
Every witness legally required to attend a state court or grand jury in any
criminal case, other than a public officer or employee, shall be entitled to
$20 for each day's attendance and a reasonable mileage fee to be established
pursuant to rules adopted by the judiciary for each mile actually and
necessarily traveled on the ground each way, including travel to and from the
nearest airport when required to travel from another island or from outside the
State.

In addition to witness' fees, every witness:

(1) Who attends a state court from outside the State
shall be entitled to the actual round-trip cost of plane travel, plus $200 per
twenty-four-hour day; or

(2) Who attends a state court from any island in the
State other than that on which the court holds session shall be entitled to the
actual round-trip cost of plane travel, plus $55 per twenty-four-hour day;
provided that when the witness is required to stay overnight, the witness shall
be entitled to an additional $145 per twenty-four-hour day.

These per diem payments shall cover all personal
expenses, such as board and lodging, and shall be computed on the basis of
quarter day periods of time.

(b) Any police officer or other public officer
or employee (except the county attorney, prosecuting attorney, or deputy county
attorney or deputy prosecuting attorney), who attends a state court as a
witness from a district other than that in which the court is holding session,
shall be allowed the police officer's, public officer's, or employee's travel
cost and mileage fees as provided in this section. A public officer or
employee, if not salaried, shall receive witness fees. [L 1907, c 53, §1; am L
1909, c 145, §1; RL 1925, §2560; am L 1925, c 23, §1; am L 1932 1st, c 13, §1;
RL 1935, §3816; RL 1945, §9827; am L 1945, c 38, §1; RL 1955, §222-7; am L
1963, c 57, §1; HRS §621-7; am L 1972, c 104, §1(e); am L 1980, c 305, §1; gen
ch 1985; am L 1989, c 176, §1; am L 2014, c 195, §2; am L 2016, c 159, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

"District" means one of the districts listed in
§4-1. Att. Gen. Op. 73-1.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next